Hawaii statutes.
§451J-7 Application for licensure.
Any person who files an application with the department after December 31,
1998, shall be issued a license by the department if the applicant provides
satisfactory evidence to the department that the applicant is qualified for
licensure pursuant to the requirements of this chapter and meets the following
qualifications:

(1) Has completed a master's degree or doctoral
degree from an accredited educational institution in marriage and family
therapy or in an allied field related to the practice of mental health
counseling which includes or is supplemented by graduate level course work
comprising a minimum of thirty-three semester, or forty-four quarter hours in
the following course areas:

(A) Marriage and family studies--nine
semester or twelve quarter hours;

(B) Marriage and family therapy studies--nine
semester or twelve quarter hours;

(C) Human development--nine semester or
twelve quarter hours;

(D) Ethical and professional studies--three
semester or four quarter hours; and

(E) Research--three semester or four quarter
hours;

(2) Has one year practicum with three hundred hours
supervised client contact;

(3) Completes one thousand hours of direct marriage
and family therapy, and two hundred hours clinical supervision in not less than
twenty-four months; and

(4) Has passed the National Marriage and Family
Therapy Exam in accordance with section 451J-8.

An individual who is a clinical member of the
association shall be deemed to have met the educational and clinical experience
requirements of this section. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 11, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next